Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Article 7. Estrays.

§ 69-13-301.
Estrays to be taken up, posted, and ranger notified.

When a person shall find any horse, mule, jack, cattle, sheep, goat or hog straying upon his land, he may take up such animal, and, if the owner be known, he shall forthwith send the estray to the owner or notify him of the taking up of same. If the owner shall be unknown the person taking up such animal straying, shall forthwith post up a notice thereof, with a full description of the animal, in two public places in the supervisor’s district, and at the courthouse door, for five days, at the expiration of which time, if an owner shall not have claimed the property and paid the charges allowed by law, he shall give information thereof to the ranger, or, if he reside more than ten miles distant, or if there should be no ranger, to a justice of the peace; and shall make oath before such justice or ranger that such animal was taken up straying at or on his farm or land, or the farm of which he has charge, and that the brands or marks of the animal have not been altered or defaced since the taking up.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 12, art. 1 (1); 1857, ch. 32, art. 3; 1871, § 289; 1880, § 899; 1892, § 1715; 1906, § 1893; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1541; 1930, § 5449; 1942, § 4877.

§ 69-13-303.
Appraisement and description of estrays.

On receiving notice of the taking up of an estray, the ranger or justice of the peace shall issue his summons to two disinterested and competent persons of the neighborhood who, first having been sworn to value and appraise the same truly, shall value and appraise such animal and certify the valuation under their hands, together with a particular description of the kind, marks, brand, stature, color, and age, which certificate shall be returned or transmitted to the ranger within ten days to be registered.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 12, art. 1 (1); 1857, ch. 32, art. 3; 1871, § 289; 1880, § 899; 1892, § 1716; 1906, § 1894; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1542; 1930, § 5450; 1942, § 4878.

§ 69-13-305.
Registering and advertising estrays.

The ranger shall keep a book in which he shall register all certificates of estrays delivered or returned to him, and shall file the same in regular order; and without delay, on receipt of such certificate, he shall advertise the same, stating therein the name of the person by whom the estray was taken up and the description and marks thereof, and the amount of the appraisement. If the appraisement exceed twenty dollars, he shall publish the advertisement three weeks in the nearest newspaper; and if the appraisement be less than twenty dollars, such advertisement shall be put up in three public places in the county, one of which shall be at the courthouse door. He shall also make out a correct list of all estrays in his county, and put up the same at the door of the courthouse on the first day of each regular January and July meeting of the board of supervisors, stating therein such as have been proved away or sold, or have escaped or died.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 12, art. 1 (3); 1857, ch. 32, art. 2; 1871, § 288; 1880, § 905; 1892, § 1717; 1906, § 1895; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1543; 1930, § 5451; 1942, § 4879.

§ 69-13-307.
Estray may be used by taker up.

Any person taking up estrays may retain possession thereof and use and employ the same in a proper and reasonable manner until claimed or sold according to law, without being liable to the owner thereof, and shall provide such estrays with sufficient wholesome sustenance; and if an animal so taken up die or accidentally get away, the taker up shall not be answerable for the same unless such death or escape be occasioned by ill treatment or neglect. Any person taking up and using an estray under the provisions of this section shall be liable for reasonable hire for the use thereof, to be fixed by the ranger, the same to be set off against the expense of keeping said estray.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 12, art. 1 (9); 1857, ch. 32, art. 5; 1871, § 291; 1880, § 901; 1892, § 1719; 1906, § 1897; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1545; 1930, § 5453; 1942, § 4881.

§ 69-13-309.
Estray suitable for food slaughtered.

When an animal fit for food shall be taken up as an estray, and shall become troublesome, the person taking up the animal may have three disinterested citizens summoned by the ranger or a justice of the peace to appraise such estray, and he may kill the same, and pay the amount of the appraisement to the ranger or other person entitled to receive the same.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 901; 1892, § 1721; 1906, § 1899; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1547; 1930, § 5455; 1942, § 4883.

§ 69-13-311.
Death or escape of estrays reported.

When any estray shall die or escape, the taker up shall, without delay, make report thereof to the ranger, on oath, who shall make a memorandum of the same on the margin of his book opposite the registry of the certificate of such estray.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 12, art. 1 (4); 1857, ch. 32, art. 5; 1871, § 291; 1880, § 901; 1892, § 1720; 1906, § 1898; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1546; 1930, § 5454; 1942, § 4882.

§ 69-13-313.
Estrays to be sold if not claimed.

If the estray shall not be claimed and proved within the time allowed and before actual sale, the same shall be sold by the ranger at the courthouse door, for cash, after giving three weeks’ notice of the time and place of sale by an advertisement put up in one of the most public places in each supervisor’s district, one of which shall be at the courthouse door; and the sale may be made on the first Monday of any month, and between the hours of twelve and four o’clock of the day of the sale; and estray horses, mules, jacks, jennets, and colts over two years old, and work-oxen shall be delivered at the courthouse on the day of sale. All other estrays may be delivered on the premises of the taker up.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 12, art. 1 (6, 11); 1857, ch. 32, art. 6; 1871, § 292; 1880, § 902; 1892, § 1723; 1906, § 1901; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1549; 1930, § 5457; 1942, § 4885.

§ 69-13-315.
How owner may prove and reclaim.

A person claiming to be the owner of any animal taken up as an estray and posted as herein provided, may make proof of his title by his oath, or otherwise, to the satisfaction of the ranger, who shall thereupon issue his order to the person having the estray in his custody, to deliver the same to such owner on payment of the lawful charges, to be ascertained and stated by the ranger.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 32, art. 4; 1871, § 290; 1880, § 900; 1892, § 1718; 1906, § 1896; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1544; 1930, § 5452; 1942, § 4880.

§ 69-13-317.
Time allowed owner to claim and prove property.

The owner of all estrays appraised at more than fifty dollars shall be allowed three months; the owners of estrays appraised at twenty dollars and not exceeding fifty dollars, shall be allowed two months; and the owner of estrays valued at less than twenty dollars shall be allowed one month from the date of the certificate of appraisement to claim and prove property to the same.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 12, art. 1 (6); 1857, ch. 32, art. 6; 1871, § 292; 1880, § 902; 1892, § 1722; 1906, § 1900; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1548; 1930, § 5456; 1942, § 4884.

§ 69-13-319.
Owner of estray sold entitled to net proceeds.

The owner of any animal sold as an estray, may apply to the board of supervisors of the county within three years, and, upon proof of title, the said board shall order the net proceeds of the sale thereof to be refunded to him out of the county treasury.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 12, art. 1 (7); 1857, ch. 32, art. 8; 1871, § 294; 1880, § 910; 1892, § 1729; 1906, § 1907; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1555; 1930, § 5463; 1942, § 4891.

§ 69-13-321.
Ranger may seize estray not delivered according to law.

The ranger may seize and sell any estray which shall not be delivered according to law, and shall be allowed for such seizure the same fees as a sheriff is entitled to for executing a writ of execution.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 904; 1892, § 1725; 1906, § 1903; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1551; 1930, § 5459; 1942, § 4887.

§ 69-13-323.
Date and amount of sale noted on register and paid to county treasurer.

The ranger shall note the time and amount of sale in his register opposite the record of the certificate of such estray, and shall forthwith pay over to the depository of the county the net proceeds of such sale, after deducting all lawful charges; and it shall be his duty to make a full report in writing, under oath, to the board of supervisors, at each regular meeting in January and July, of the amount of money received by him on account of the sale of estrays, and a detailed statement of the disposition thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 32, art. 7; 1871, § 293; 1880, § 906; 1892, § 1726; 1906, § 1904; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1552; 1930, § 5460; 1942, § 4888.

§ 69-13-325.
Ranger’s books open to inspection.

The books kept by the ranger for the registration of estrays shall be open to the inspection of every person free of charge; and, at the expiration of his office, shall be handed over to his successor; and, when filed, shall be deposited with the clerk of the chancery court of the county, who shall preserve them.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 908; 1892, § 1728; 1906, § 1906; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1554; 1930, § 5462; 1942, § 4890.

§ 69-13-327.
Ranger to administer oaths.

The ranger is authorized to administer all oaths and take affidavits necessary in the discharge of his duties.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 1732; 1906, § 1909; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1557; 1930, § 5465; 1942, § 4893.

§ 69-13-329.
Authority of person other than county ranger as to estrays; fees.

A justice of the peace, where there is a county ranger, shall not have authority to do any act concerning estrays, except to take the information from the taker up and to issue the summons for the appraisers; and he shall be entitled to the same fee for such service as the ranger, to be collected and paid over by the ranger; but if there be not a ranger, a justice of the peace may perform all the duties.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 1730; 1906, § 1908; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1556; 1930, § 5464; 1942, § 4892.

§ 69-13-331.
Stallion suffered to run at large may be gelded.

If any person shall suffer any stallion above the age of two years to run at large, out of an inclosure, it shall be lawful for any person to confine and geld such stallion, at the risk of the owner; but this section shall not apply to such stallions as are usually kept up, and happen to get out by accident.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 12, art. 1 (14); 1857, ch. 32, art. 15; 1871, § 301; 1880, § 912; 1892, § 1734; 1906, § 1911; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1559; 1930, § 5467; 1942, § 4895.

§ 69-13-333.
Not lawful for drover to drive animals from range; penalty.

It shall not be lawful for a drover or other person to drive any horse, mule, cattle, hog, or sheep of another from the lands to which the same may belong, whether the same be an estray or not; but it shall be his duty, if any other such stock shall join his, immediately to halt at the nearest convenient place and separate such stock as does not belong to him or to the person for whom he may be employed; and if any person shall violate the provisions of this section, he shall forfeit twenty dollars for every offense, with costs, recoverable before a justice of the peace, by and for the use of any person who will sue for the same, and shall also be liable in damages to the party injured; and when any person employed in driving stock shall violate the provisions of this section, he and his employer shall be liable to the like penalties; but the recovery of such penalty shall not be a bar to indictment for larceny.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 12, art. 1 (12); 1857, ch. 32, art. 14; 1871, § 300; 1880, § 911; 1892, § 1733; 1906, § 1910; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1558; 1930, § 5466; 1942, § 4894.

§ 69-13-335.
Penalty on ranger for failure of duty.

For any failure of the ranger to make out and put up a correct list of all the estrays in his county, or to make his report to the board of supervisors as required, the board of supervisors may fine the ranger not less than five nor more than fifty dollars, which may be collected by scire facias and execution.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 32, art. 9; 1871, § 295; 1880, § 907; 1892, § 1727; 1906, § 1905; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1553; 1930, § 5461; 1942, § 4889.

§ 69-13-337.
Penalty for violating the law as to estrays.

If any person shall take up any horse, mare, mule, jack, cattle, sheep, goat or hog as an estray, contrary to the provisions of this article; or if any person, having taken up such animal, shall fail to send it to or notify the owner, if known, or to give information to the ranger as required, or shall fail to perform any duty required of him, or shall abuse such animal, or shall use the same in an unreasonable or improper manner, so that damage shall be done to the owner, or the value of the animal be impaired; or if any person shall take or send away an estray out of this state, or shall trade, sell, or barter the same; or if any taker up shall fail to deliver said estray to the ranger at the courthouse on the day of the sale of said estray, such person shall, for every such offense, be punished as for a misdemeanor, and, in addition thereto, shall be liable to the owner for the value of the animal; and the taker up shall forfeit all compensation for taking up and keeping such estray.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 12, art. 1 (10); 1857, ch. 32, art. 10; 1871, § 296; 1880, § 903; 1892, § 1724; 1906, § 1902; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1550; 1930, § 5458; 1942, § 4886.

§ 69-13-339.
Impounding of livestock illegally roaming on state military reservation; lien; sale of unclaimed animals.

The Mississippi Military Department, acting through the training site supervisor at Camp Shelby, is hereby authorized and empowered to take up and impound in a proper enclosure all livestock found roaming at large upon any state-owned or leased lands comprising the state military reservation in Forrest and contiguous counties, in violation of the statewide stock law statutes.

The training site supervisor shall provide a safe and secure enclosure in which such livestock shall be impounded, and will insure that such animals are cared for in a humane manner until removed for such enclosure as hereinafter provided. It shall be unlawful for any owner of livestock or any other person to remove such livestock without the authority of the training site supervisor, and such offense shall be deemed a misdemeanor.

There is hereby created a statutory lien in the amount of the cost of impounding each animal, not to exceed Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00), against each head of cattle, horse or mule, and all other livestock so found upon and impounded upon the state military reservation; and in addition a lien of One Dollar and Fifty Cents ($1.50) per day shall accrue for the feeding and care of each animal so impounded. No animal shall be removed by its owner until the full lien is paid in cash to the training site supervisor, who shall give a receipt for such money paid and account for the same in the manner to be established by the military department. All funds collected under this section shall be forwarded to the adjutant general on or before the fifth day of each month, and such funds shall be expended under his supervision in carrying out the provisions of this section and in making improvements to the military reservation.

The training site supervisor shall publish a monthly notice in one (1) newspaper having general circulation in Forrest County, the general description of the livestock impounded and held on the end of the preceding month, and said notice shall offer the lawful owners the opportunity to claim their livestock by a day and hour certain, but not less than ten (10) days, after paying the full statutory lien imposed. All animals not claimed by the designated date and hour may be sold as a herd to the highest bidder for cash within ten (10) days and a proper receipt shall be given the purchaser and the funds accounted for as provided for in the preceding subsection.

This section is declared to be remedial legislation and is enacted for the purposes of protecting the personal and real property of the state military reservation known as Camp Shelby from livestock illegally thereon, and enhancing the safety of members of the National Guard and other reserve military forces of Mississippi and other states which train and conduct military exercises and maneuvers on said lands; and neither the training site supervisor, nor any other public employee, shall be liable in any civil or criminal court in carrying out the provisions of this section. The purchasers of livestock under the provisions of this section shall receive a valid title, and such purchaser shall not be liable in a civil or criminal court to any person for any purchase made under this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4895.5; Laws, 1968, ch. 485; Laws, 1981, ch. 319, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1981.